Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 353.22.1 of Title 59, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Chloroquine, hydroxychloroquine, and ivermectin shall be over-
the-counter drugs and a pharmacist or pharmacy shall not require a
prescription for the purchase of such drugs. If the State Board of
Pharmacy finds that a pharmacist or pharmacy is in violation of this
section, the Board shall immediately revoke the license of the
pharmacist or pharmacy and fine the pharmacist or pharmacy One
Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) per occurrence.


Req. No. 10747 Page 1

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10747 TJ 12/11/24





















Req. No. 10747 Page 2